Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5346HV (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2328 Section 1. Section 8A.341, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. If money is appropriated for this purpose, by November 1 3 of each year supply a report which contains the name, gender, 4 county, or city of residence when possible, official title, 5 salary received during the previous fiscal year, base salary as 6 computed on July 1 of the current fiscal year, and traveling 7 and subsistence expense of the personnel of each of the 8 departments, boards, and commissions of the state government 9 except personnel who receive an annual salary of less than one 10 thousand dollars. The number of the personnel and the total 11 amount received by them shall be shown for each department in 12 the report. All employees who have drawn salaries, fees, or 13 expense allowances from more than one department or subdivision 14 shall be listed separately under the proper departmental 15 heading. On the request of the director, the head of each 16 department, board, or commission shall furnish the data 17 covering that agency. The report shall be distributed upon 18 request without charge in an electronic medium to each caucus 19 of the general assembly, the legislative services agency, the 20 chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the secretary 21 of the senate made available on an internet site maintained 22 by the department . Copies Upon request, copies of the report 23 shall be made available to other persons in an electronic 24 medium upon payment of a fee, which shall not exceed the cost 25 of providing the copy of the report. Sections 22.2 through 26 22.5 apply to the report. All funds from the sale of the report 27 shall be deposited in the printing revolving fund established 28 in section 8A.345 . 29